Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [196.055] REQUIREMENTS FOR COMPETITIVE GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of veterans affairs. new text end new text begin (c) "Dependent child" means a child under the age of 22 who is a biological or adopted child of a veteran. new text end new text begin (d) "Immediate family member" means a spouse or dependent child of a veteran. new text end new text begin (e) "Veteran" means a person who is a resident of Minnesota and who served in the armed forces of the United States of America. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grantee eligibility. new text end new text begin To be eligible to receive a competitive grant administered by the commissioner, the grantee must be: new text end new text begin (1) a Minnesota-based nonprofit organization that has been operating for at least five years; new text end new text begin (2) be in good standing with the Office of the Attorney General; and new text end new text begin (3) have a current federal tax form 990 on file with the federal Internal Revenue Service. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Limitations on use of grant money. new text end new text begin A grantee may only use grant money subject to this section to provide services to: (1) Minnesota veterans; (2) immediate family members of a Minnesota veteran; or (3) immediate family members of a deceased Minnesota veteran who died in the line of duty. If there are insufficient resources to serve all eligible applicants, a grantee must serve veterans with physical, mental, or chemical health disabilities before serving other eligible applicants. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant application scoring system. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop a grant application scoring system that evaluates grant applications based upon an applicant's demonstrated history of serving veterans. The scoring system must include measurable outcomes for veterans previously served by the applicant. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Grant amounts. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall determine the amount of each competitive grant awarded based on the results of the scoring system developed pursuant to subdivision 4. The commissioner may not use a grantee's request for a designated grant amount as a factor to determine the amount of the grant awarded to the grantee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Suspension of grant money. new text end new text begin The commissioner may withhold amounts awarded to a grantee if the commissioner determines that the grantee has committed fraud, is under criminal investigation, has conducted itself in a manner that brings the state of Minnesota or the Department of Veterans Affairs into disrepute, or is incapable of delivering the services required under the grant agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in 2027, by February 15 of each year a grantee must submit a report to the commissioner that includes the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a summary of the purpose of the grant; new text end new text begin (2) the grant amount provided to the grantee; new text end new text begin (3) the amount of previous grants issued by the commissioner to the grantee; new text end new text begin (4) the amount of other state and federal grants received by the grantee in the most recent fiscal year; new text end new text begin (5) the number of veterans, active service members, and immediate family members served by the grantee; new text end new text begin (6) the number of veterans, active service members, and immediate family members who successfully completed the grantee's programming and the criteria used to determine successful completion of the program; and new text end new text begin (7) the grantee's charitable giving ratio. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may require a grantee to report information in addition to the required information under paragraph (a) if specified in the grantee's grant agreement with the state. new text end new text begin (c) Beginning in 2027, by March 1 of each year the commissioner must submit a report on grantees that received competitive grants from the agency in the preceding year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance. The report must summarize the information and aggregate the data provided by grantees under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Administrative costs. new text end new text begin The commissioner may retain up to five percent of the amount appropriated for competitive grants to fund administrative and compliance monitoring costs related to the grants. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Interaction with other law. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the requirements for competitive grants established in this section are in addition to the applicable grants management requirements imposed under sections 16B.97 to 16B.991. new text end